tests/ь.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] some stems with ь, where it changes to и (мнглбвр)":
    хорь<v><tv><ifi> : хорилоо
    хорь<v><tv><aor> : хорино
    хорь<v><tv><gna_imp> : хорин
    урь<v><tv><gna_cnd> : уривал
    урь<v><tv><aor> : урина

 "[twol] some stems with ь, where it changes to и (not мнглбвр)":
    хорь<v><tv><ger><nom> : хорих

 "[twol] some stems with ь, where it stays ь":
    хорь<v><tv><past> : хорьсон
    хорь<v><tv><hab> : хорьдог
    хорь<v><tv><gna> : хорьж

 "[twol] ь intervening in {B}:б phonology":
    холь<v><tv><gna_cnd> : холибол
